Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-396
Streets; grade; petition of property owners; order of city.

The city may order any street or alley or part thereof graded to an established grade whenever there is filed an approved petition of the record owners of a majority of the frontage of taxable property upon that part of the street proposed to be graded.

Laws 1959, c. 36, § 13, p. 200.